District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-706

Commencement of proceedings; jurisdiction of Superior Court.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 286, Pub. L. 85-94, § 6
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 586, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 165(d)
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748
1981 Ed., § 30-306.
1973 Ed., § 30-306.